Idaho statutes. Title 22 AGRICULTURE AND HORTICULTURE
Chapter 13
DEALERS IN FARM PRODUCE

Sec.

§ 22-1301. Definitions. [Repealed.]

§ 22-1302. Exemptions from act. [Repealed.]

§ 22-1303. License required

Application, additional bond, issuance, fees. [Repealed.]

§ 22-1304. Bond

Certificate of deposit in lieu of bond. [Repealed.]

§ 22-1305. Requirements of dealers in paying for farm products. [Repealed.]

§ 22-1306. List of licensees — Posting of licenses

Disposition of fees. [Repealed.]

§ 22-1307. Cash buyers. [Repealed.]

§ 22-1308. Rules

Enforcement of act. [Repealed.]

§ 22-1309. Investigations, examinations or inspections

Complaints by consignors. [Repealed.]

§ 22-1310. Refusal, revocation or suspension of licenses. [Repealed.]

§ 22-1311. Review of granting or refusal of license. [Repealed.]

§ 22-1312. Records to be kept by commission merchants. [Repealed.]

§ 22-1313. Report of sales by commission merchants — Remittances to consignor

Certificate of department. [Repealed.]

§ 22-1314. Certain sales prima facie fraudulent. [Repealed.]

§ 22-1315. Violations and penalties — Criminal — Civil

Venue of actions and prosecutions. [Repealed.]

§ 22-1316. Drawing checks insufficiently covered a felony. [Repealed.]

§ 22-1317. Separability. [Repealed.]